Florida, session 2026, SB168.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 14 15 Section 1.âSubsections (2) and (11) of section 893.138, 16 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 17 893.138âLocal administrative action to abate certain 18 activities declared public nuisances.â 19 (2)âAny place or premises that has been used: 20 (a)âOn more than two occasions within a 6-month period, as 21 the site of a violation of s. 796.07; 22 (b)âOn more than two occasions within a 6-month period, as 23 the site of the unlawful sale, delivery, manufacture, or 24 cultivation of any controlled substance; 25 (c)âOn one occasion as the site of the unlawful possession 26 of a controlled substance, where such possession constitutes a 27 felony and that has been previously used on more than one 28 occasion as the site of the unlawful sale, delivery, 29 manufacture, or cultivation of any controlled substance; 30 (d)âBy a criminal gang for the purpose of conducting 31 criminal gang activity as defined by s. 874.03; 32 (e)âOn more than two occasions within a 6-month period, as 33 the site of a violation of s. 812.019, relating to dealing in 34 stolen property; 35 (f)âOn two or more occasions within a 6-month period, as 36 the site of a violation of chapter 499; 37 (g)âOn more than two occasions within a 6-month period, as 38 the site of a violation of any combination of the following: 39 1.âSection 782.04, relating to murder; 40 2.âSection 782.051, relating to attempted felony murder; 41 3.âSection 784.045(1)(a)2., relating to aggravated battery 42 with a deadly weapon; or 43 4.âSection 784.021(1)(a), relating to aggravated assault 44 with a deadly weapon without intent to kill; or 45 (h)âOn more than two occasions within a 12-month period, as 46 the site of a violation of s. 562.12, relating to the unlicensed 47 or unlawful sale of alcoholic beverages; or 48 (i)âOn more than two occasions within a 12-month period, as 49 the site of a violation of s. 849.01, relating to keeping a 50 gambling house, 51 52 may be declared to be a public nuisance, and such nuisance may 53 be abated pursuant to the procedures provided in this section. 54 (11)âThe provisions of This section may be supplemented by 55 a county or municipal ordinance. The ordinance may include, but 56 is not limited to, any of the following: 57 (a)âprovisions that establish additional Penalties for 58 public nuisances, including fines not to exceed $250 per day. If 59 the nuisance activity is not abated within 1 year, the fines may 60 increase to $500 per day. In determining the amount of the fine, 61 the nuisance abatement board shall consider the gravity of the 62 public nuisance and any actions taken by the property owner to 63 correct the public nuisance.; provide for the payment of 64 reasonable costs, including 65 (b)âReasonable attorney fees associated with investigations 66 of and hearings on public nuisances. If attorney fees are 67 requested, the nuisance abatement board must also award fees for 68 the time and labor of any legal assistants who contributed 69 nonclerical, meaningful legal support to the matter. For 70 purposes of this subsection, the term âlegal assistantâ means a 71 person who, under the supervision and direction of an attorney, 72 engages in legal research and case development or planning. 73 (c)â; Provide for Continuing jurisdiction for renewing 74 periods a period of 1 year over any place or premises that has 75 been or is declared to be a public nuisance, until the public 76 nuisance is abated.; establish penalties, including fines not to 77 exceed $500 per day for recurring public nuisances; 78 (d)âProvide for The recording of orders on public nuisances 79 so that notice must be given to subsequent purchasers, 80 successors in interest, or assigns of the real property that is 81 the subject of the order.; provide that Recorded orders on 82 public nuisances may become liens against the real property that 83 is the subject of the order.; and 84 (e)âProvide for The foreclosure of property subject to a 85 lien and the recovery of all costs, including reasonable 86 attorney fees and legal assistant fees, associated with the 87 recording of orders and foreclosure. If a lien remains unpaid 3 88 months after it is filed, the nuisance abatement board may 89 authorize the appropriate entity to foreclose on the lien. If 90 the public nuisance activity is unabated after 2 years, the 91 nuisance abatement board must authorize and require the 92 appropriate entity to foreclose on the lien. A No lien created 93 pursuant to the provisions of this section may not be foreclosed 94 on real property that which is a homestead under s. 4, Art. X of 95 the State Constitution. If Where a local government seeks to 96 bring an administrative action, based on a stolen property 97 nuisance, against a property owner operating an establishment 98 where multiple tenants, on one site, conduct their own retail 99 business, the property owner is shall not be subject to a lien 100 against his or her property or the prohibition of operation 101 provision if the property owner evicts the business declared to 102 be a nuisance within 90 days after notification by registered 103 mail to the property owner of a second stolen property 104 conviction of the tenant. The total fines imposed pursuant to 105 the authority of this section shall not exceed $15,000. Nothing 106 contained within This section does not prohibit prohibits a 107 county or municipality from proceeding against a public nuisance 108 by any other means. 109 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.